Washington statutes.
RCW 23.86.230

Merger of cooperative association with one or more cooperative associations or business corporations—Rights, powers, duties and liabilities of surviving entity—Articles.

(1) Upon issuance of the certificate of merger by the secretary of state, the merger of the cooperative association into another cooperative association or ordinary business corporation, as the case may be, shall be effected.

(2) When merger has been effected:

(a) The several parties to the plan of merger shall be a single cooperative association or corporation, as the case may be, which shall be that cooperative association or corporation designated in the plan of merger as the survivor.

(b) The separate existence of all parties to the plan of merger, except that of the surviving cooperative association or corporation, shall cease.

(c) If the surviving entity is a cooperative association, it shall have all the rights, privileges, immunities and powers and shall be subject to all the duties and liabilities of a cooperative association organized under chapter 23.86 RCW. If the surviving entity is an ordinary business corporation, it shall have all the rights, privileges, immunities and powers and shall be subject to all the duties and liabilities of a corporation organized or existing under Title 23B RCW.

(d) Such surviving cooperative association or corporation, as the case may be, shall thereupon and thereafter possess all the rights, privileges, immunities, and franchises, both public and private of each of the merging organizations, to the extent that such rights, privileges, immunities, and franchises are not inconsistent with the corporate nature of the surviving organization; and all property, real, personal and mixed, and all debts due on whatever account, including subscriptions to shares, and all other choses in action, and all and every other interest of or belonging to or due to each of the organizations so merged shall be taken and deemed to be transferred to and vested in such surviving cooperative association or corporation, as the case may be, without further act or deed; and the title to any real estate, or any interest therein, vested in any such merged cooperative association shall not revert or be in any way impaired by reason of such merger.

(3) The surviving cooperative association or corporation, as the case may be, shall, after the merger is effected, be responsible and liable for all the liabilities and obligations of each of the organizations so merged; and any claim existing or action or proceeding pending by or against any of such organizations may be prosecuted as if the merger had not taken place and the surviving cooperative association or corporation may be substituted in its place. Neither the right of creditors nor any liens upon the property of any cooperative association or corporation party to the merger shall be impaired by the merger.

(4) The articles of incorporation of the surviving cooperative association or of the surviving ordinary business corporation, as the case may be, shall be deemed to be amended to the extent, if any, that changes in such articles are stated in the plan of merger.

[ 1991 c 72 s 20; 1989 c 307 s 29; 1971 ex.s. c 221 s 4.]

NOTES:

Legislative finding—1989 c 307: See note following RCW 23.86.007.